Washington statutes.
RCW 10.118.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Contractor" means the institution of higher education contracted with the office of the attorney general to implement the statewide use of force data program as provided in this chapter.

(2) "Great bodily harm" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.04.110.

(3) "Institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.92.030.

(4) "Law enforcement agency" or "agency" means any general authority Washington law enforcement agency and limited authority Washington law enforcement agency as those terms are defined in RCW 10.93.020.

(5) "Substantial bodily harm" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.04.110.

[ 2021 c 326 s 2.]